Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 234 Liquefied Petroleum Gas and Other Flammable Liquids

234.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

234.020.
Permits required. [Repealed.]

234.030.
Issuance of permits; duration; fee; fund for administration. [Repealed.]

234.040.
Regulations prescribing safety standards. [Repealed.]

234.050.
Conformity with standards of National Board of Fire Underwriters. [Repealed.]